Utah statutes.
53A-22-101.   Purpose of chapter.

It is the purpose of this chapter to provide school districts with the ability to raise funds for necessary new school construction, including additions to existing school buildings caused by the development of industrial plants that require large numbers of workers for their construction and operation.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

